Connecticut, session 2026, SB00367.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) The chairpersons of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public safety and security shall convene a working
group to study roadside safety concerns associated with wreckers and
towing and recovery professionals. Such study shall include, but need
not be limited to, an evaluation of what color and type of lights should
be allowed on wreckers and methods to enhance the protection of
towing and recovery professionals while such professionals secure
wrecked or disabled motor vehicles at roadside scenes.
(b) The working group shall include, but need not be limited to, the
following members:
(1) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public safety and security, or their designees;
(2) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
or the commissioner's designee;

Senate Bill No. 367
(3) The Commissioner of Transportation, or the commissioner's
designee; and
(4) One representative of an organization in the state that represents
towing and recovery professionals, appointed by the chairpersons of the
joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public safety and security.
(c) The chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and
security shall schedule the first meeting of the working group, which
shall be held not later than sixty days after the effective date of this
section.
(d) The members of the working group shall select two
cochairpersons from among the members of the working group.
(e) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety
and security shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
(f) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a
report on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public safety and security, in accordance with the provisions
of section 11-4a of the general statutes. The working group shall
terminate on the date that it submits such report or January 1, 2027,
whichever is later.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-26 2 of 2